test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-párra_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Normal even-syllable nouns. The nouns to nomen derivations are also tested. Lexicon MUORRA, ALFABET, NOADE, AHKA, GÁDDE, DARRHA, SÁMEGIEL, ÅLGGO

Tests:
  Noun - klássa: # MUORRA
    klássa+G3+N+Sg+Nom: klássa
    klássa+G3+N+Sg+Ela: klássas
    klássa+G3+N+Sg+Ill: klássaj
    klássa+G3+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: klássasj
    klássa+G3+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: klássalasj
#    klássa+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: klássasimme
#    klássa+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: klássas


  Noun - káffa: # MUORRA
    káffa+G3+N+Sg+Nom: [káffa , gáffa]
    káffa+G3+N+Sg+Ela: [káfas , gáfas]
    káffa+G3+N+Sg+Ill: [káffaj, gáffaj]
    káffa+G3+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [káfasj, gáfasj]
    káffa+G3+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: [káfalasj, gáfalasj]
    
#  Noun - jáffo: # MUORRA
#    jáffo+G3+N+Sg+Nom: jáffo
#    jáffo+G3+N+Sg+Ela: jáfos
#    jáffo+G3+N+Sg+Ill: jáffuj
#    jáffo+G3+N+Sg+Gen: jáfo
#    jáffo+G3+N+Sg+Com: [jáfujn, jáfojn]
#    jáffo+G3+N+Pl+Nom: jáfo
#    jáffo+G3+N+Pl+Ela: jáfojs
#    jáffo+G3+N+Pl+Ill: jáfojda
#    jáffo+G3+N+Pl+Gen: jáfoj
#    jáffo+G3+N+Pl+Com: jáfoj
#    jáffo+G3+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: jáfusj
#    jáffo+G3+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: jáfulasj
#    jáffo+G3+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: jáfodibme


  Noun - linnja: # MUORRA
    linnja+N+G3+Sg+Nom: linnja
    linnja+N+G3+Sg+Ela: linnjas
    linnja+N+G3+Sg+Ill: linnjaj
    linnja+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: linnjasj
#    linnja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: linnjas
#    linnja+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: linnjasimme
    linnja+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Attr: linnjalasj

  Noun - gussa: # MUORRA
    gussa+N+Sg+Nom: gussa
    gussa+N+Sg+Ine: gusán
    gussa+N+Sg+Ill: gussaj
    gussa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gusásj
#    gussa+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: gussas
#    gussa+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: gussam
#    gussa+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: gussat
#    gussa+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: gusám
#    gussa+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: gusáma
#    gussa+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: gusáma
#    gussa+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: gusáska
#    gussa+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: gussasimme
#    gussa+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2: gussasihtte
#    gussa+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: gussasihtte
#    gussa+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: gussasimme
#    gussa+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: gusástisá
#    gussa+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: gusástimme
#    gussa+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: gusájis   
#    gussa+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: gusájimme
    gussa+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: gusálasj
    
  Noun - boaksa: # MUORRA
    boaksa+N+Sg+Nom: boaksa
    boaksa+N+Sg+Gen: båvsa
    boaksa+N+Sg+Ill: boaksaj
    boaksa+N+Pl+Ill: båvsajda
    boaksa+N+Ess: boaksan
    boaksa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båvsasj
    boaksa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båvsatjasj
    boaksa+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: båvsadibme
    boaksa+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    boaksa+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: båvsalasj
    boaksa+N+Abe: [båvsadak, båvsada] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
#    boaksa+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: boaksas
#    boaksa+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: boaksasimme

  Noun - snjuktja: # MUORRA
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Nom: [snjuktja,sjnjuktja]
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Ine: [snjuvtjan,sjnjuvtjan]
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Ill: [snjuktjaj,sjnjuktjaj]
#    snjuktja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: snjuktjas
#    snjuktja+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: [snjuktjasimme, sjnjuktjasimme]
    snjuktja+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [snjuvtjalasj, sjnjuvtjalasj]

  Noun - ráddná: # MUORRA 
    ráddná+N+Sg+Nom: ráddná
    ráddná+N+Sg+Ine: rádnán
    ráddná+N+Sg+Ill: ráddnáj
#   ráddná+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ráddnás
    ráddná+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: rádnálasj

  Noun - dievvá: # MUORRA 
    dievvá+N+Sg+Nom: dievvá
    dievvá+N+Sg+Ine: dieván
    dievvá+N+Sg+Ill: dievváj
#   dievvá+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: dievvás
    dievvá+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: dieválasj

  Noun - goahte: # MUORRA
    goahte+N+Sg+Nom: goahte
    goahte+N+Sg+Acc: goadev
    goahte+N+Sg+Ela: goades
    goahte+N+Sg+Com: gådijn
    goahte+N+Ess: goahten
    goahte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: goadásj
#    goahte+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: goahtem		 # have to fix px
#    goahte+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: goahtes		 # have to fix px
#    goahte+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: goades		 # have to fix px
#    goahte+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2: goahtásihtte # have to fix px
#    goahte+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: goadestisá	 # have to fix px
#    goahte+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: gådijdis   	 # have to fix px
#    goahte+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: gådijimme	 # have to fix px
    goahte+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: goadálasj
  
  Noun - jávrre: # MUORRA
    jávrre+N+Sg+Nom: jávrre
    jávrre+N+Sg+Ela: jávres
    jávrre+N+Sg+Ill: jávrráj
    jávrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: jávrásj
#    jávrre+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: jávrres
#    jávrre+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: jávrrásimme
    jávrre+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: jávrálasj

  Noun - siebdde: # MUORRA
    siebdde+N+Sg+Nom: siebdde
    siebdde+N+Sg+Gen: siebde
#    siebdde+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [sæbdáma, säbdáma]
    siebdde+N+Sg+Acc: siebdev
    siebdde+N+Sg+Ine: siebden
    siebdde+N+Ess: siebdden
 #   siebdde+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: [siebdestam, siebdestim]
 #   siebdde+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: [siebdestat, siebdestit]
 #   siebdde+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [siebdijnam, siebdijnim]
    siebdde+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [sæbdásj, säbdásj]
    siebdde+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [sæbdálasj, säbdálasj]

  Noun - boanndi: # MUORRA (kin)
    boanndi+N+Sg+Nom: boanndi
    boanndi+N+Sg+Ine: båndin
    boanndi+N+Sg+Ill: boanndij
#   boanndi+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: boanndis
    boanndi+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: båndilasj

  Noun - jáddi: # MUORRA
    jáddi+N+Sg+Nom: jáddi
    jáddi+N+Sg+Ine: játtin
    jáddi+N+Sg+Ill: jáddij
#   jáddi+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: jáddis
    jáddi+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: játtilasj

  Noun - svilli: # MUORRA (kin)
    svilli+N+Sg+Nom: svilli
    svilli+N+Sg+Ine: svilin
    svilli+N+Sg+Ill: svillij
#    svilli+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: svillis
#    svilli+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: svillisimme
    svilli+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: svililasj

  Noun - bælldo: # MUORRA 
    bælldo+N+Sg+Nom: [bælldo, bälldo]
    bælldo+N+Sg+Ine: [bældon, bäldon]
    bælldo+N+Sg+Ill: [bællduj, bällduj]
#   bælldo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [bælldos, bälldus]
    bælldo+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: beldulasj

  Noun - árvvo: # MUORRA 
    árvvo+N+Sg+Nom: árvvo
    árvvo+N+Sg+Ine: árvon
    árvvo+N+Sg+Ill: árvvuj
#   árvvo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: árvvos
    árvvo+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: árvulasj

  Noun - gåhppå: # MUORRA
    gåhppå+N+Sg+Nom: [gåhppå, kåhppå]
    gåhppå+N+Sg+Ine: [gåhpån, kåhpån]
    gåhppå+N+Sg+Ill: [gåhppåj, kåhppåj]
#    gåhppå+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [gåhppås, kåhppås]
#    gåhppå+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: [gåhppåsimme, kåhppåsimme]
    gåhppå+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [gåhpålasj, kåhpålasj]

  Noun - hægganieda: # NOADE
    hægganieda+N+Sg+Nom: [hægganieda, hägganieda]
    hægganieda+N+Sg+Ela: [hægganiedas, hägganiedas]
    hægganieda+N+Sg+Ill: [hægganiedaj, hägganiedaj]
    hægganieda+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [hægganiedasj, hägganiedasj]
    hægganieda+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: [hægganiedalasj, hägganiedalasj]

  Noun - siksta: # NOADE
    siksta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sikstasj
    siksta+N+Sg+Acc: sikstav
    siksta+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: sikstalasj

  Noun - råda: # NOADE
    råda+N+Sg+Nom: råda
    råda+N+Sg+Ela: rådas
    råda+N+Sg+Ill: rådaj
    råda+N+Pl+Ine: rådajn
    råda+N+Pl+Com: rådaj
    råda+N+Pl+Ill: rådajda
    råda+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: rådasj
#    råda+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: rådas
    råda+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: rådalasj
#    råda+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: rådasimme

  Noun - muohtá: # NOADE
    muohtá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: muohtásj
    muohtá+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: muohtás
    muohtá+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: muohtálasj
    muohtá+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: muohtásimme

  Noun - budá: # NOADE
    budá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: budásj
    budá+N+Sg+Acc: budáv
    budá+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: budálasj

  Noun - lahttebiddjá: # NOADE
    lahttebiddjá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: lahttebiddjásj
    lahttebiddjá+N+Sg+Acc: lahttebiddjáv
    lahttebiddjá+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: lahttebiddjálasj

  Noun - noade: # NOADE
    noade+N+Sg+Nom: noade
    noade+N+Sg+Ela: noades
    noade+N+Sg+Ill: noadáj
    noade+N+Pl+Ine: nådijn
    noade+N+Pl+Com: nådij
    noade+N+Pl+Ill: nådijda
    noade+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: noadásj
#    noade+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: noades
    noade+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: noadálasj
#    noade+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: noadásimme
 
  Noun - irgge: # NOADE
    irgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: irggásj
    irgge+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: irgges
    irgge+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: irggálasj
    irgge+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: irggásimme

  Noun - aktisasjráde: # NOADE
    aktisasjráde+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: aktisasjrádásj
    aktisasjráde+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: aktisasjrádálasj

  Noun - fádi: # NOADE
    fádi+N+Sg+Nom: fádi
    fádi+N+Sg+Ela: fádis
    fádi+N+Pl+Ine: fádijn
    fádi+N+Pl+Com: fádij
    fádi+N+Pl+Ill: fádijda
    fádi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: fádisj
#    fádi+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: fádis
    fádi+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: fádilasj
#    fádi+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: fádisimme
    
  Noun - girkko: # NOADE
    girkko+N+Sg+Nom: girkko
    girkko+N+Sg+Gen: girkko
#    girkko+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: girkkuma
    girkko+N+Sg+Acc: girkkov
    girkko+N+Sg+Ine: girkkon
    girkko+N+Sg+Ill: girkkuj
    girkko+N+Sg+Ela: girkkos
    girkko+N+Sg+Com: [girkkojn, girkkujn]
    girkko+N+Pl+Nom: girkko
    girkko+N+Pl+Gen: girkkoj
    girkko+N+Pl+Acc: girkkojt
    girkko+N+Pl+Ine: girkkojn
    girkko+N+Pl+Ill: girkkojda
#    girkko+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: girkkojdiseda
    girkko+N+Pl+Ela: girkkojs
    girkko+N+Pl+Com: girkkoj
    girkko+N+Ess: girkkon
    girkko+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: girkkusj
 #   girkko+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: girkkos
    girkko+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: girkkulasj
 #   girkko+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: girkkusimme

  Noun - birsso: # NOADE
    birsso+N+Sg+Nom: birsso
    birsso+N+Sg+Ela: birssos
    birsso+N+Sg+Ill: birssuj
    birsso+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: birssusj
    birsso+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: birssulasj
#    birsso+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: birssos
#    birsso+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: birssusimme

  Noun - tjuovggaláhtto: # NOADE
    tjuovggaláhtto+N+Sg+Nom: tjuovggaláhtto
    tjuovggaláhtto+N+Sg+Ela: tjuovggaláhttos
    tjuovggaláhtto+N+Sg+Ill: tjuovggaláhttuj
    tjuovggaláhtto+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjuovggaláhttusj
    tjuovggaláhtto+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: tjuovggaláhttulasj
    
  Noun - gámavuodo: # NOADE
    gámavuodo+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gámavuodusj
    gámavuodo+N+Sg+Acc: gámavuodov
    gámavuodo+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: gámavuodulasj    
    
  
  Noun - bierjjedahka: # AHKA
    bierjjedahka+N+Sg+Nom: [bierjjedahka, bierjjedak]
    bierjjedahka+N+Pl+Nom: bierjjedagá
    bierjjedahka+N+Sg+Ill: bierjjedahkaj
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bierjjedagásj
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bierjjedagátjasj
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bierjjedagádibme
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bierjjedahka+N+Abe: [bierjjedagádak, bierjjedagáda] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
#    bierjjedahka+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: bierjjedahkas
#    bierjjedahka+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: bierjjedahkasimme
    bierjjedahka+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Noun - dulvve: # GÁDDE
    dulvve+N+Sg+Nom: dulvve
    dulvve+N+Sg+Acc: dulvev
    dulvve+N+Sg+Ill: dulvváj
    dulvve+N+Sg+Com: dulvijn
    dulvve+N+Ess: dulvven
    dulvve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dulvásj
#    dulvve+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: dulvves
#    dulvve+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: dulvvásimme
    dulvve+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dulvep
    dulvve+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dulvemus
    dulvve+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: dulválasj

  Noun - oajvve: # GÁDDE
    oajvve+N+Sg+Nom: oajvve
    oajvve+N+Sg+Gen: oajve
#    oajvve+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: oajváma
    oajvve+N+Sg+Acc: oajvev
    oajvve+N+Sg+Ine: oajven
    oajvve+N+Sg+Ill: oajvváj
    oajvve+N+Sg+Ela: oajves
    oajvve+N+Sg+Com: åjvijn
    oajvve+N+Pl+Nom: oajve
    oajvve+N+Pl+Gen: åjvij
    oajvve+N+Pl+Acc: åjvijt
    oajvve+N+Pl+Ine: åjvijn
    oajvve+N+Pl+Ill: åjvijda
#    oajvve+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: åjvijdiseda
    oajvve+N+Pl+Ela: åjvijs
    oajvve+N+Pl+Com: åjvij
    oajvve+N+Ess: oajvven
    oajvve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oajvásj
#    oajvve+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: oajvves
#    oajvve+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: oajvvásimme
    oajvve+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: oajvep
    oajvve+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: oajvemus
    oajvve+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: oajválasj
